Utah statutes.
78B-5-823.   Effect on immunity, exclusive remedy, indemnity, and
contribution.
Nothing in Sections 78B-5-817 through 78B-5-822 affects or impairs any common
law or statutory immunity from liability, including, but not limited to,
governmental immunity as provided in Title 63G, Chapter 7, Governmental
Immunity Act of Utah, and the exclusive remedy provisions of Title 34A,
Chapter 2, Workers' Compensation Act.  Nothing in Sections 78B-5-817 through
78B-5-822 affects or impairs any right to indemnity or contribution arising
from statute, contract, or agreement.
